Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Construction of Court Facilities

26A.160.
Design, financing, and construction of court facilities — Rules of procedure and guidelines — Oversight — Financing requirements — Project standards — Application.

The Chief Justice shall establish rules of procedure or guidelines on matters relating to the design, financing, and construction of court facilities. The rules or guidelines shall encompass:

The duties and responsibilities of the Administrative Office of the Courts under this section;

Criteria for evaluating the feasibility or practicability of various contracting or construction methods;

A project management system for managing, monitoring, and reporting on projects through all phases from funding to completion, including change-order procedures;

Assistance to counties in evaluating proposals for architectural, construction, or other professional services;

Methods for financing energy savings projects, Americans with Disabilities Act projects, and other improvement projects;

Kentucky standards for court facilities, including detailed requirements for space, construction, interior and exterior finishes, structural and mechanical systems, fixed and moveable furniture and equipment, and maximum unit cost for court facilities throughout the Commonwealth; and

The maintenance and operation of court facilities after construction.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall oversee the design, financing, and construction of court facilities. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall:

Assess the need for court facilities construction or renovation throughout the Commonwealth. The assessment shall consider the age, space adequacy, projected needs, structural soundness, mechanical and electrical systems, security needs, and interior and exterior quality of existing court facilities;

Develop a project program for the construction or renovation of court facilities that the Administrative Office of the Courts determines to be most in need of construction or renovation, based on the needs assessment required under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The project program shall detail a complete and specifically defined court facilities project that conforms to the Kentucky standards for court facilities established under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section, and shall include itemized space requirements, space relationships, design goals, scope limits, site considerations, cost estimates, and a proposed project budget;

Establish the financial condition of any county that contains a court facility for which a project program under paragraph (b) of this subsection has been developed to determine the county’s ability to participate in the proposed project. The Administrative Office of the Courts may discharge this responsibility by obtaining certification of the county’s financial condition from the Department for Local Government under KRS 147A.021(5);

Develop a prioritized list, with cost estimates, based on land availability and the considerations required by this section, of proposed court facilities projects, and submit the list to the Chief Justice for approval and to the Court Facilities Standards Committee for informational purposes only. Upon approval by the Chief Justice, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit the prioritized list to the Capital Planning Advisory Board, by April 15 of each odd-numbered year, in accordance with KRS

7A.120

; and

Develop and maintain uniform contracts to be used by local units of government when procuring architectural, construction, financial, or other services relating to court facilities projects authorized by the General Assembly.

Before the Administrative Office of the Courts submits a budget request for court projects under KRS

48.050

, each local unit of government that is expected to participate in financing a requested court project shall enter into a written memorandum of agreement with the Administrative Office of the Courts. Each county with a court project authorized by the 2000 General Assembly shall enter into a written memorandum of agreement with the Administrative Office of the Courts. The agreement shall be developed by the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall specify the rights, duties, and obligations of the local unit of government and the Administrative Office of the Courts relating to the project, and shall be contingent upon the project’s authorization by the General Assembly.

No contract and no modification to any contract relating to the design, financing, or construction of court facilities projects authorized by the General Assembly shall be executed unless first reviewed and approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

All court facilities projects, beginning with those authorized by the 2000 General Assembly, shall comply with the Kentucky standards for court facilities established under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section. No other standards shall be used.

This section shall not affect or apply to any contract executed prior to July 14, 2000.

All local units of government or any other entity providing space to the Court of Justice under KRS

26A.100

shall, consistent with the law, comply with the rules of procedure and guidelines established by the Chief Justice and administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 496, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 11, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 18, effective July 15, 2010.

26A.162.
Determination of use allowance — Presumption of twenty year bond issue — Standards for longer term of issue — Legislative oversight.

The use allowance in the judicial branch budget recommendation submitted under KRS

48.100

shall be determined as if bonds will be issued for a term of twenty (20) years at the prevailing market rate, computed from the estimated date that the Court of Justice will occupy the facility. If the market rate for the bonds has increased when the bonds are to be sold, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may approve an extension in the bond term, up to a total of twenty-five (25) years, but only as necessary to keep the annual use allowance within the budgeted amount. All bonds issued by any local unit of government for court facilities projects shall be limited to the term approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Before approving any bond issue for a term exceeding twenty-five (25) years, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit a proposal for the extended term to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee. The proposal shall include a statement of the necessity for the extended bond term and the impact of the extended term on the project’s budgeted scope and authorized annual use allowance.

Within thirty (30) days after receiving a proposal to extend a bond term beyond twenty-five (25) years, the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall either approve or disapprove the proposal and shall then promptly notify the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts. If either committee disapproves the proposal, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall take one (1) of the following actions and shall notify the committee of its decision in writing within thirty (30) days:

Disapprove and take no further action on the proposal;

Revise the proposal to comply with the committee’s objections; or

Determine to approve and proceed with the proposal over the committee’s objection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 496, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

26A.164.
Court facility use allowance contingency fund — Purpose — Conditional use — Legislative oversight.

There is created a court facility use allowance contingency fund. The fund shall consist of money appropriated to it in the judicial branch budget by the General Assembly. Money in the fund shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year or biennium.

The Court of Justice may agree to increase the budgeted scope of a court project or project pool authorized in a judicial branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly, and may use the use allowance contingency fund to cover any resulting increase in the budgeted annual use allowance, if and only if:

The appropriate unit of government first submits a proposal for the increase to the Court Facilities Standards Committee, and the Court Facilities Standards Committee approves the increase;

The annual use allowance for the project or project pool, adjusted for the proposed increase in scope, would not exceed the annual use allowance specified for that project or project pool in the multiyear use allowance schedule set out in the judicial branch budget bill by more than fifteen percent (15%); and

The requirements of KRS

26A.166

have been met.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 496, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2011, ch. 73, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

26A.166.
Increase in budgeted scope of court facility project — Conditions for approval — Legislative oversight.

Before the Court of Justice gives final approval to an increase in the budgeted scope of an authorized project or project pool listed in a judicial branch budget bill which would result in an increased use allowance, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit a proposal for the increase to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting. The proposal shall include:

The multiyear use allowance specified in the judicial branch budget bill;

The proposed increase in the use allowance;

The reasons and necessity for the proposed increase;

A statement as to whether or how the proposed use of funds conforms with the requirements of the law; and

Any other information that the committee requests.

Within thirty (30) days after receiving a proposal to increase the use allowance, the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall either approve or disapprove the proposal and shall then promptly notify the director of the Administrative office of the Courts of its decision.

If the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee disapproves the proposal, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall take one (1) of the following actions and shall notify the committee of its decision in writing within thirty (30) days of receiving the committee’s notice of disapproval:

Revise the proposal to comply with the committee’s objections;

Cancel and take no further action on the proposal; or

Determine to implement the proposal over the committee’s objection.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee within thirty (30) days of any action taken by the Court of Justice to approve a scope increase of a project within a pool which would increase the use allowance for that project.

The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall maintain records of proposals, findings, decisions, and actions taken under this section. When appropriate, the committee shall provide this information to other legislative committees or to the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 496, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2011, ch. 73, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

26A.168.
Reports on status of court facilities projects and contingency fund.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at the committee’s January, April, July, and October regular meetings, a status report of all incomplete court facilities projects. The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall prescribe data elements for the quarterly status reports. For each project, the status report shall include:

The project title;

The county in which the project is located;

The scope and use allowance authorized for the project in the judicial branch budget, and any increases to the scope or use allowance under KRS

26A.164

;

The current status of the project;

Estimated completion date of the project;

An explanation of any delay or major change in the project, including deletion or modification of project components; and

Any other information that the committee requests.

On August 1 of each year, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a financial report on the court facility use allowance contingency fund for the fiscal year ending on June 30 of that year. The report shall include, with explanations, allotments, expenditures, encumbrances, and the available balance.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 496, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 328, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2011, ch. 73, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.